Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2013
Construction projects; federal funds; application; requirements.

Applications for hospital construction projects for which federal funds are requested shall be submitted to the department and may be submitted by the state or any political subdivision thereof or by any public or nonprofit agency authorized to construct and operate a hospital. Each such application shall conform to federal and state requirements.

Laws 1947, c. 232, § 13, p. 737;

Laws 1965, c. 421, § 10, p. 1353;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 515.